Utah statutes.
40-5-6.   Mine rescue team required -- Immunity of rescue participants.
(1) Each mine owner shall maintain and support a mine rescue team at such
owner's mine or otherwise ensure the availability of a mine rescue team in the
event of an emergency, in accordance with the requirements of the Federal Mine
Safety and Health Act of 1977, and the regulations promulgated under it.
(2)  An individual, mine owner, or sponsoring owner who participates in a mine
rescue operation during an emergency at the owner or sponsor's mine and who in
good faith provides emergency care or assistance to an injured person during
the emergency, is not liable in damages to such injured person on account of
rendering emergency care or assistance.
